



































JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

WHITE PAPER

https://socialmedia.market/


2

CONTENTS

DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY 

1. INTRODUCTION
1.1.  ADVANTAGES OF SOCIAMEDIA.MARKET PLATFORM

1.2. ADVANTAGES OF SOCIAL MEDIA TOKEN (SMT)

2. THE INFLUENCER MARKET OPPORTUNITY
2.1. WHAT IS INFLUENCER MARKETING

2.2. MARKET OVERVIEW

2.3. INFLUENCER MARKETING CHALLENGES (PROBLEM DEFINITION)

3. SOLUTION
3.1. OVERVIEW

3.2. ECOSYSTEM PARTICIPANT

3.3. SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET FEATURES AND BENEFITS

3.4. FEATURES AND BENEFITS OF SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET FOR  BRANDS
        &  ADVERTISERS

3.5. FEATURES FOR INFLUENCERS

3.6. FEATURES AND BENEFITS OF SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET FOR AGENTS

3.7. HOW IT WORKS?
3.7.1.  CAMPAIGN AND SMART CONTRACT CREATION FOR ADVERTISERS

3.7.2. INFLUENCER PROFILE VERIFICATION AND INTERACTION WITH   
 BRANDS

3.7.3. DECENTRALIZED DISPUTE SOLUTION

3.7.4 RATING SYSTEM

3.7.5. DATA SCIENCE

3.6. COMPETITIVE ADVANTAGES

4. PLATFORM AND TOKEN ECONOMY
4.1. BUSINESS MODEL

4.2. SOCIAL MEDIA TOKEN

CONTENTS



3

4.3. ADOPTION 

5. TECHNOLOGY OVERVIEW
5.1 CONCEPT OF BUILDING AN APPLICATION

5.2 ARCHITECTURE

5.3 DOCKERIZING 

5.4 ORCHESTRATION OF CONTAINERS

5.5 COMMUNICATION BETWEEN SERVICES

5.6 CLOUD AS A METHOD OF APPLICATION STORAGE

5.7 APPLICATION DEVELOPMENT AND SUPPORT

5.8 BASIC TECHNOLOGY STACK

6. DEVELOPMENT AND ECOSYSTEM EXPANSION PLAN

6.1. ROADMAP

6.2. MARKETING STRATEGY

6.3. GEOGRAPHICAL EXPANSION 

6.4. REVENUE FORECAST

7. TOKEN DISTRIBUTION
7.1. OVERVIEW

7.2. TOKEN SALE: PHASE #1

7.3. TOKEN SALE: PHASE #2

7.4. KNOW YOUR CUSTOMER (“KYC”) 

7.5. USE OF FUNDS

7.6. BOUNTY AND REFERRAL PROGRAMS

8. TEAM
8.1. OUR TEAM 

8.2 OUR ADVISORS

9. MEDIA

10. CONTACTS

11. RISK FACTORS

12. SOURCES



4

DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY
PLEASE REVIEW CAREFULLY THE PRESENT SECTION “DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY”. IF YOU HAVE ANY 

DOUBTS AS TO WHAT ACTIONS YOU SHOULD TAKE, WE RECOMMEND THAT YOU CONSULT WITH 

YOUR LEGAL, FINANCIAL, TAX OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL ADVISOR(S). No part of this Whitepaper 

is to be reproduced, distributed or disseminated without including this section “Disclaimer of 

Liability”.

The sole purpose of this Whitepaper is to present SocialMedia.Market and SMT tokens to poten-

tial token holders in connection with the proposed ICO. The information is provided for INFORMA-

TION PURPOSES only. It may not be exhaustive and doesn’t imply any elements of a contractual 

relationship or obligations. Despite the fact that we make every effort to ensure the accuracy, up 

to date and relevance of any material in this Whitepaper, this document and materials contained 

herein are not professional advice and in no way constitutes the provision of professional advice 

of any kind. Further, SocialMedia.Market reserves the right to modify or update this Whitepaper 

and information contained herein, at any moment and without notice. To the maximum extent 

permitted by any applicable laws, regulations and rules, SocialMedia.Market doesn’t guarantee 

and doesn’t accept legal responsibility of any nature, for any indirect, special, incidental, conse-

quential or other losses of any kind, in tort, contract or otherwise (including but not limited to loss 

of revenue, income or profits, and loss of use or data), arising from or related to the accuracy, 

reliability, relevance or completeness of any material contained in this Whitepaper. Further, 

SocialMedia.Market  does not make or purport to make, and hereby disclaims, any representa-

tion, warranty or undertaking in any form whatsoever to any entity, person, or authority, including 

any representation, warranty or undertaking in relation to the truth, accuracy and completeness 

of any of the information set out in this Whitepaper. You should contact relevant independent 

professional advisors before relying or making any commitments or transactions based on the 

material published in this Whitepaper.

This Whitepaper is not subject to any legal system and is not governed by any law. No regulatory 

authority has examined or approved of any of the information set out in this Whitepaper, and no 

such action has been or will be taken under the laws, regulatory requirements or rules of any 

jurisdiction. The publication, distribution or dissemination of this Whitepaper does not imply that 



5

the applicable laws, regulatory requirements or rules have been complied with.

You don’t have the right and shouldn’t buy SMT tokens if you are (i) a green card holder of the 

United States of America, or (ii) a citizen or a resident (tax or otherwise) of the United States of 

America, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands of United States, or any other possessions of the United 

States of America, or person of that states, or (iii) a citizen or resident (tax or otherwise) of any 

country or territory where transactions with digital tokens and/or digital currencies are prohibited 

or in any other manner restricted by applicable laws. (“Person” is generally defined as a natural 

person residing in the relevant state or any entity organized or incorporated under the laws of 

the relevant state).  Purchased tokens cannot be offered or distributed as well as cannot be 

resold or otherwise alienated by their holders to mentioned persons. It is your sole responsibility 

to establish, by consulting (if necessary) your legal, tax, accounting or other professional advisors, 

what requirements and limitations, if any, apply to your particular jurisdiction, and ensure that 

you have observed and complied with all restrictions, at your own expense and without liability to 

SocialMedia.Market.

SMT tokens are not and will not be intended to constitute securities, digital currency, commodity, 

or any other kind of financial instrument and have not been registered under relevant securities 

regulations, including the securities laws of any jurisdiction in which a potential token holder is a 

resident. This Whitepaper is not a prospectus or a proposal, and its purpose is not to serve as a 

securities offer or request for investments in the form of securities in any jurisdiction. However, in 

spite of the above, legislation of certain jurisdictions may, now or in future, recognize SMT tokens 

as securities. SocialMedia.Market does not accept any liability for such recognition and\or any 

legal and other consequences of such recognition for potential owners of SMT tokens, nor pro-

vide any opinions or advice regarding the acquisition, sale or other operations with SMT tokens, 

and the fact of the provision of this Whitepaper doesn’t form the basis or should not be relied 

upon in matters related to the conclusion of contracts or acceptance investment decisions. This 

Whitepaper doesn’t oblige anyone to enter into any contract, to take legal obligations with respect 

to the sale or purchase of SMT tokens, and to accept any cryptocurrency or other form of pay-

ment. Potential owners of SMT tokens are advised to contact relevant independent professional 

advisors, on the above matters.

Certain statements, estimates and financial information contained herein, constitute for-

ward-looking statements or information. Such forward-looking statements or information involve 

known and unknown risks and uncertainties, which may cause actual events or results to differ 



6

materially from the estimates or the results implied or expressed in such forward-looking state-

ments. Further, all examples of calculation of income and profits used in this Whitepaper were 

provided only for demonstration purposes or for demonstrating the industry’s averages. For 

avoidance of doubt, nothing contained in this Whitepaper is or may be relied upon as a guaran-

tee, promise, representation or undertaking as to the future performance of 

SocialMedia.Market and/or SMT token, and/or promise or guarantee of future profit resulting 

from purchase of SMT token.

SMT tokens cannot be used for any purposes other than as provided in this Whitepaper, including 

but not limited to, any investment, speculative or other financial purposes. SMT tokens confer no 

other rights in any form, including but not limited to any ownership, distribution (including, but 

not limited to, profit), redemption, liquidation, property (including all forms of intellectual proper-

ty), or other financial or legal rights, other than those specifically set forth below. While the 

community’s opinion and feedback can be taken into account, SMT tokens do not give any right to 

participate in decision-making or any direction of business related to the SocialMedia.Market 

service.

English language of this Whitepaper is the primary official source of information about the SMT 

tokens, any information contained herein may from time to time be translated into other lan-

guages or used in the course of written or oral communications with customers, contractors, 

partners etc. In the course of such translation or communication some of the information con-

tained herein may be lost, corrupted or misrepresented. In the event of any conflicts or inconsist-

encies between such translations and communications and this English language of Whitepaper, 

the provision of this English language of Whitepaper as original document shall prevail.

By continuing reading this Whitepaper, you confirm that you have read, understood, 

accepted, and agreed with, the above section “Disclaimer of Liability”. 



7

1. INTRODUCTION
In a world of rising digital content consumption where traditional media resources are losing their 

audience daily, brands and companies are increasing their digital marketing budgets. Nonethe-

less, reaching their target audience is tricky, nowadays. Recent research shows that 47% of overall 

mobile and desktop internet users are now using ad-blocking software.1 This number has almost 

doubled in comparison to the previous year. Furthermore, 36% of traffic2 generated by Pay-per-

click (PPC) campaigns are suspected to be fraudulent or non-human. Hence, brands are seeking 

new ways of advertising their products and services, discovering the power and realizing the 

importance of Influencer Marketing.

Recently, social media platforms like YouTube, Facebook, Instagram and Twitter have seen 

explosive growth, connecting over 3.03 billion people every day3. As the amount of time spent 

online rises globally, consumer behavior changes. Advertising campaigns continue to shift from 

traditional to digital marketing, and consequently, offline marketing isn’t as effective as it used to 

be. However, not all digital marketing strategies are effective in reaching consumers. In the past 

few years companies and agencies have discovered Influencer Marketing as the strategy with the 

most potential and return, with over 80% of them finding this strategy effective4.

UNLIKE TRADITIONAL ADVERTISING, INFLUENCER 
MARKETING PROVIDES BRANDS THE OPPORTUNITY
TO GARNER CREDIBILITY AND GAIN ATTENTION

Influencer Marketing has been a part of the promotional campaigns of the gaming and entertain-

ment industries for years. Ultimately, digital agencies demonstrated the value of this advertising 

channel to corporations and large companies. And now, even small businesses are interested in 

allocating marketing budgets on popular bloggers or celebrities, who have influence over poten-

tial consumer audiences. Because, unlike traditional advertising, Influencer Marketing provides 

1  Source: Ad-Blocking GlobalWebIndex GWI INSIGHT REPORT /// Q3 2016
2  Source: Millennials GlobalWebIndex.  GlobalWebIndex Q3-Q4 2015
3  Source: Social Media Engagement GlobalWebIndex GWI INSIGHT REPORT /// Q2 2017
4  Source: The State-of-Influencer Marketing 2017 Final-Repor © 2016 LINQIA



8

brands the opportunity to garner credibility and gain attention.

Still, Influencer Marketing remains a complicated process for both advertisers building their 

campaigns and influencers seeking a way to monetize their content. Obscure and uncertain price 

determination, insecure transactions, non-compliance with executed agreements, fraud, lack of 

control and unreliable analytic instruments create challenging ROI determination. This imbalance 

gives the major advertising assets to digital marketing agencies and top social media celebrities. 

With our core team know-how and expertise in entertainment, marketing, analysis and product 

development, we have a clear vision of how to implement Blockchain and Smart Contract technol-

ogy in a day-to-day solution that will resolve market needs and help develop them, exponentially. 

We are building SocialMedia.Market – the first decentralized ecosystem to discover, create, 

perform and analyze advertising campaigns with social media influencers across any social 

network. Blockchain technology will simplify the integration between advertisers and publishers 

and decrease costs for all engaged parties. SocialMedia.Market creates a completely safe and 

transparent ecosystem for everyone involved in influencer marketing, opening up the opportuni-

ties for brands and influencers across the globe to reach their targeted audience of get rewarded 

for engaging their consumers with the content they enjoy. We will help elevate advertising mar-

kets to the next level and take considerable market share very quickly as cryptocurrency and 

Blockchain technology become mainstream in the next few years.

SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET –  THE DECENTRALIZED ECOSYSTEM TO DISCOV-
ER, CREATE, PERFORM AND ANALYZE ADVERTISING CAMPAIGNS WITH 
SOCIAL MEDIA INFLUENCERS ACROSS ANY SOCIAL NETWORK

Our team is inspired to popularize Blockchain and Smart Contract technologies, making them 

more common in our daily life. We apply extra effort to introduce SocialMedia.Market’s platform, 

globally, to millions of influencers from small and medium-sized businesses to larger corpora-

tions.



9

1.1. ADVANTAGES OF SOCIAMEDIA.MARKET PLATFORM

A short list of advantages SocialMedia.Market will provide to all parties as a service:

TRANSPARENT and competitive marketplace

WIDE range of social media platforms, such as: YouTube, Instagram, Facebook, Twitter, 
etc.

REDUCED operational costs and fees when working with Influencer campaigns

ACCESSIBLE and easy-to-use, even for small businesses and influencers in the early 
stage of social presence

REDUCING TIME and resources being spent on influencer marketing campaigns;

SMART partnership for a wide range of users with the ability to create smart contracts 
tailored to specific needs using templates and smart tips

FAIR dispute solution based on decentralized Blockchain technology

ULTIMATE results, smart planning with Real-Time Analytics and Data Science 

GLOBAL outreach allows project to aim for larger market share, higher diversity and 

less dependency on local regulations

1.2.  ADVANTAGES OF SOCIAL MEDIA TOKENS (SMT)

A short list of advantages SMT will provide to all parties as a single currency:

SAFE escrow transactions based on Blockchain technology 

LOW-COST transactions with less operation fees

SIMPLIFIED and FAST global payments 

Earn REWARDS by participating in the decentralized dispute solution system

Get agent commission within the platform

DONATIONS METHOD for bloggers and streamers

UTILITY TOOL for acquiring outstanding marketing services, premium analytics and 
development instruments 



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

THE INFLUENCER 
MARKET OPPORTUNITY2

https://socialmedia.market/


11

2.1. WHAT IS INFLUENCER MARKETING?

With digital and social media gaining popularity, new engagement strategies have also been 

developed to help increase brand advocacy such as Influencer Marketing. Influencer Marketing, 

defined, is “a form of marketing in which focus is placed on influential people rather than the 

target market as a whole”. An influential person/influencer (or blogger, celebrity, opinion leader) 

can be described as someone that has the power to motivate followers in the industry where 

their buying decisions are concerned.

The use of social media marketing has exploded over the last few years. Well-known brands and 

smaller businesses truly realized the potential reach and engagement opportunity provided by 

social media channels. Analysing the following statistics: consumer purchase decision, rise of 

digital advertising and social media, increase in the use of ad-blockers, etc., it becomes obvious 

that today’s influencers are some of the most valuable and viable media channels available. 

Business can drive a more optimized, omni-channel marketing plan by utilising Influencer Market-

ing, and will be more likely to reach their target audience and deliver a larger ROI.



12

There are many different types of influencers: from an industry blogger with great content and 

good site traffic to an ordinary Twitter member with a large following. Celebrities, journalists, 

analysts, thought leaders, brand journalists, platform-specific “sensations” etc., can become 

influencers, too.

INFLUENCER MARKETING, IS A FORM OF MARKETING IN WHICH 
FOCUS IS PLACED ON INFLUENTIAL PEOPLE RATHER THAN THE 
TARGET MARKET AS A WHOLE CELEBRITIES & THOUGHT LEADERS

One of the main benefits of Influencer Marketing is that such promotions look like native recom-

mendations from the influencers, not as paid aggressive advertising. In the recent researches 

almost 92%1 of respondents admitted that they rely heavily on the opinion of an influencer or 

opinion leader while deciding to buy a product. So, an influencer can deliver the message of a 

brand in a natural way, improving trust.

2.2. MARKET OVERVIEW

1. One of the fastest growing marketing trends, expected to reach 

$10B by 2020.

2. The average time the user spends in social networks has grown 

by almost 24% in the past 5 years2, leading to the expansion of 

social networks and the growth of the ad blockers usage.

3. Influencer Marketing becomes one of the most efficient ways to 

attract attention to a brand. According to the recent researches 

the influencer marketing ROI reaches $11.69 per $1 spent.

1  Source: Social Media Engagement GlobalWebIndex  Q2 2017 
2  Source: Social Media Engagement GlobalWebIndex  Q2 2017



13

SocialMedia.Market targets Influencer Marketing, one of the fastest-growing markets. Analytical 

reports show an increase in almost all metrics related to Influencer Marketing. Growing exponen-

tially, by recent estimates this market will turn into a $5–10 billion industry within the next 5 

years1.

SocialMedia.Market targets Influencer Marketing, one of the fastest-growing markets. Analytical 

reports show an increase in almost all metrics related to Influencer Marketing. Growing exponen-

tially, by recent estimates this market will turn into a $5–10 billion industry within the next 5 

years2.

Though, traditional media has only slightly declined, with TV still holding a strong position as a 

medium of content consumption and brand discovery, the overall time spent by internet users 

online exceeded the time spent on all traditional media combined, over the past 5 years.

The longer online presence due to the expansion of mobile internet has not has a significant 

impact on traditional media as some of this additional online time happens simultaneously. 

Internet users tend to second-screen, or consume multimedia on any chosen device and mobile 

at the same time. Altogether, these factors increased the average time spent on social media by 

34 minutes and posting frequency by 50%3.

1  Source: trends.google.com - https://goo.gl/qzvqG4
2  Source: trends.google.com - https://goo.gl/qzvqG4
3 Source: Generation_Z GlobalWeb GlobalWebIndex Q4 2016

60

80

40

20

0

2016 201720152014

8
14

80+

56

Growth of Google trend index for Influencer Marketing



14

As previously mentioned, this shift has two important effects - higher social media consumption 

and an increase in the utilization of ad-blocking. As internet users’ behaviors shift, consumer 

awareness of ad-blocking increases. Alternative forms of brand promotion are set to gain trac-

tion, as desktop and mobile ad-blocking tactics advance. Particularly, those forms of brand 

advertising that revolve around social and mobile channels are currently immune to ad-blockers; 

including Influencer Marketing, sponsored editorials and in-app advertising. 

The brand discovery market still relies heavily on search engines and TV ads, although in the last 

couple of years a clear trend of using social networks for marketing purposes has developed 

among Millennials and Generation Z, the most active internet buyers currently. Furthermore, this 

trend is predicted to continue over the next 5 years. Tending to rely on word-of-mouth and 

reviews or opinions of trusted leaders or celebrities, this channel is smartly being utilized by most 

marketers. And despite its complexities, more than half of companies plan to increase budgets on 

Influencer Marketing in the next year.

Based on this report, with 86% of marketers applying this type of marketing and 94% of those 

marketers finding it to be a very effective tactic for advertising, we can emphatically conclude that 

hr:min %

Online TV / Streaming

Online Radio / Music

Online Press

Social Networks / Services

Other

00:56

00:39

00:50

02:04

01:54

15%

10%

13% 

32% 

30%

Number of hours and minutes per day typically devoted to the following

30%

10%
13%

32%

15%

SHARE OF
ONLINE

MEDIA TIME

49%

of overall desktop and mobile 
device owners use 

ad-blocking software

of internet users discover 
products and ser vices on social 

networks

of people rely on the influencers' 
opinion when making a buying 

decision



15

marketers are predicted to increase their budgets regarding Influencer Marketing, with only 4% 

planning to decrease it . Some of the most preferred social channels are Instagram, Facebook and 

YouTube. Influencer blogs have also proven to be an important channel, with nearly 87% of 

respondents leveraging them as tool for improving brand discovery1. The average budget per 

program for most marketers is around $50,000 - $100,000, while 18% plan to increase to over 

$100,000 and up to $500,0002. The top challenge for 2018 will be measuring the ROI of Influencer 

Marketing campaigns. 

When handled in-house, most marketers only work with a small number of influencers per 

program, dedicating a good deal of time per week to each influencer as the process of managing 

Influencer Marketing programs can be very time-consuming. Subsequently, as Influencer Market-

ing has evolved, a variety of services aiding brands in the navigation of this emerging sector have 

developed. The bulk of marketers use managed or “turn-key” services when executing their 

Influencer Marketing programs, while others use self-service, SaaS platforms to automate influ-

encer outreach, management, and reporting. Accordingly, identifying which Influencer Marketing 

partner to work with, will be the second biggest challenge of 2018.

According to an eMarketer study3, the consumer-packaged goods food industry generates the 

highest return, followed by travel, beauty, alcohol and beverages, and grocery. Overall, brands 

that used influencer strategies reported an average return of $11.69 for every dollar spent. 

Further, 92% of consumers are more likely to trust a brand advertising using Influencer Marketing 

Additionally, it is more cost-effective than paid advertising and leads to more credible brand 

recommendations4. For these reasons, Influencer Marketing has arguably become the most 

effective, long term marketing strategy. 

1 Source: The-State-of-Influencer-Marketing-2017 Final-Report © 2016 Linqia, Inc.
2 Source: The-State-of-Influencer-Marketing-2017 Final-Report © 2016 Linqia, Inc.
3 Source: https://www.emarketer.com/Article/How-Big-Influencers-Influence/1012904
4 Source: The-State-of-Influencer-Marketing-2017 Final-Report © 2016 Linqia, Inc.



16

OVERALL, BRANDS THAT USED INFLUENCER STRATEGIES 
REPORTED AN AVERAGE RETURN OF $11.69 FOR EVERY DOLLAR SPENT

The recent trends of digital marketing can help provide insight into the future of this field. Influ-

ence Marketing, which merges relationships between influencers and content, must be a priority 

for companies regarding digital marketing strategies. To easily manage and develop this relation-

ship, brands must utilize automated management solutions to track the potential consumers’ 

entire path to customer. By taking advantage of live video (Facebook, Twitter) features, podcasts 

and the omnipresence of mobile technologies, a rebirth of journalism will occur. Accordingly, the 

role of influencers will be redefined and integrated into a multi–functional relationship approach 

with brands.

FOR MORE DETAILS ON MARKET STATE, 
PLEASE, READ OUR TEAM RESEARCH 
“DIGITAL MARKETING STATE 2017”

https://socialmedia.market/assets/pdf/SMM_Marketing-Research_eng.pdf


17

2.3 INFLUENCER MARKETING CHALLENGES (PROBLEM DEFINITION)

Our team successfully launched more than 300 digital ad campaigns with different channels for 

more than 25 brands, during the last year. Of these ad campaigns, the best results were achieved 

by those supported by Influencer Marketing. However, this could be a misleading statistic as 

management of sponsored content created by bloggers consumed most of our time and resulted 

in unforeseen additional costs.

In the current state, the influence advertising market is highly opaque and chaotic with no regula-

tions and an army of agents and scammers. This causes inefficiency in pricing, while agent fees 

and fraud consume a large portion of the influencer’s revenue and the brands’ marketing budg-

ets.

Having over a thousand closed deals with influencers we suggest that over 30% of budget is lost 

to careless contractors, dishonest or fraudulent agents and staff maintenance. Influencer man-

agement is time-consuming, as specified above. For instance, 52% of marketers who provide 

in-house management, only work with an average of 10-25 influencers per program. 50% of 

in-house program managers estimate spending more than 25 hours managing each program. 

Additionally, 25% spend more than 50 hours managing each program. Working with agencies can 

take up to 30% of cost, and that’s only a disclosed part. Moreover, agencies limit the pool of 

Influencers they have contact with, because keeping direct contact with multiple influencers is a 

resource-intensive task.

In communicating with new and experienced bloggers, those with over 100K subscribers, we 

discovered that they encounter similar problems. Most bloggers, instead of creating new interest-

ing content which demands investment of time and money, concentrate on the monetization of 

their channel. If a blogger has an active contract with an agency or manager, 10% to 50% of 

payment is taken as their fee, leaving the blogger with only a small portion of what’s left after 

spending on content creation and channel promotion. Additionally, influencers run into the same 

scam schemes (fraudulent agents, agency managers and even advertisers) as advertisers do.

Lack of standards and guidelines for Influencer campaigns introduces more difficulties in creation 

of advertising activities and makes the market chaotic. In over 80% of cases, the content created 

by bloggers doesn’t meet the demands of the agreements made, and greatly affects the cam-

paign’s performance.



18

Despite the quick growth and development of this market, several unresolved problems persist:

FRAUD
Lack of ownership validation, non-compliance with agreements, fake audience 

engagement and followers amount.

UNCERTAIN PRICING
Many intermediaries and risks make pricing in the market chaotic and often inade-

quate, while not providing any guarantees of efficiency. 

PAYMENT COMPLEXITY
To maintain campaigns both advertisers and influencers need to operate multiple 

payment methods to simplify transactions and optimize costs.  

LOW ACCESSIBILITY
A high threshold for small and medium-sized business entry, associated with risks 

(high unpredictable costs)

DIFFICULT TO MAINTAIN RELATIONSHIPS
Lack of standards, average age of influencers and only direct online communication 

makes communications difficult to maintain for all parties.

TIME CONSUMING AND LIMITED CAMPAIGN DIVERSITY
As demonstrated, the process of managing Influencer Marketing programs is time 

consuming when handled in-house, making it a complex task to work with a large 

network of Influencers. Yet, Influencers with a smaller quantity of subscribers show 

higher engagement rates than top influencers. 

COMPLEXITY IN SELECTION OF INFLUENCERS AND ROI ANALYSIS
In a survey conducted by Tomoson1, more than half of the participants reported 

better quality leads as a result of Influencer Marketing. Therefore, the selection of 

relevant bloggers is one of the most difficult tasks for marketing managers.

1 Source: https://blog.tomoson.com/influencer-marketing-study/

1

2

3

4

5

6

7



19

The extensive use of mobile devices has caused digital media consumption to grow annually. This 

has triggered changes in internet users’ behavior like second-screening, ad-blocking, increased 

social media consumption, preferable content types etc. Consequently, marketers must adopt 

and search for alternative channels to reach the consumer effectively. Despite Influencer Market-

ing channel’s complexity, it is being used by most marketers, with more than half of them plan-

ning to increase their budgets in the next year.

SocialMedia.Market is designed to solve these problems and make Influencer Marketing accessi-

ble and transparent, creating a new generation of advertising that will be more profitable for all 

market participants.



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

THE SOLUTION3

https://socialmedia.market/


21

3.1 OVERVIEW

Our experience in solving difficulties and issues in creating advertising campaigns and developing 

interactions with Influencers, inspired us to create SocialMedia.Market – the first decentralized 

ecosystem designed to discover, create, perform and analyze advertising campaigns with social 

media influencers. 

Blockchain technology will simplify integration, reduce fraud and costs for all market participants. 

It will create a safe and transparent, competitive marketplace that will open opportunities for 

thousands of influencers and brands all over the globe, increase target audience outreach and 

engage consumers in the most relevant and efficient ways. An open, agile platform will create a 

new generation of advertising, accessible to millions of new, up-and-coming influencers, startups 

and small businesses.

SocialMedia.Market’s objective is to establish a healthy ecosystem, where:

influencers can easily access sponsorship for creating high-quality content, 

agencies get access to a constant stream of influencers and can concentrate their 

effort on testing new strategies and strengthening their expertise, 

advertisers get access to more relevant and efficient ways to engage consumers,

consumers, ultimately, gain access to the high-quality content they desire,

all token holders, participate in platform development and gaining access to 

exclusive features and services for using and owning Social Media Token

3.2 ECOSYSTEM PARTICIPANTS

SocialMedia.Market ecosystem will involve the following participants: 

SocialMedia.Market Platform including services and products related to it 

Advertisers (brands, businesses, agencies)

Influencers (or bloggers, opinion leaders)

Agents

Token Holders (can be either of participants or community members)



22

SocialMedia.Market participants interaction:

SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET PLATFORM
SocialMedia.Market platform is a decentralized ecosystem that allows advertisers to  discover, 

create, perform and analyze advertising campaigns with social media influencers. Likewise it 

allows influencers to join advertisers campaigns to monetize their channels and create more 

engaging content.

https://socialmedia.market/


23

INFLUENCER
Influencers are individuals or sometimes small groups that carry out the influence over a certain 

group of people through their online presence. Influencers possess one or more social media 

channels with a certain number of followers (their circle of influence).

ADVERTISERS
Advertisers – a person, a brand, a company 

or an agency that places advertisement in 

the platform in order to target customers 

with native advertising. 

COMMUNITY MEMBERS, TOKEN HOLDERS AND AGENTS
Any member of the community SocialMedia.Market, as well as the participant of the platform may 

be the token holder and the agent of platform with the possibility of retaining of the certain 

number of tokens on his or her account (more in the chapter “Token economics”). 

3.3 SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET’S MAIN FEATURES AND BENEFITS

SocialMedia.Market will provide the following features to all platform users:

1. SECURE TRANSACTIONS 
Delays or non-payments are problems typically associated with an Influencer’s 

platform. The advertisers and influencers have very little control over payments. In 

many cases, after project submission, the advertiser doesn’t receive the high-quali-



24

ty content agreed upon from an influencer or the influencer does not get paid. Our 

Ethereum based platform uses an escrow payment system which holds the 

contract fees until the set obligations are met. On project completion, the funds 

are released, securing the interests of both parties involved.

2. FAIR DECENTRALISED DISPUTE SOLUTION SYSTEM
Content created by Influencers is mostly perceived subjectively. This may cause disputes and 

dissatisfaction of parties with achieved results. For the most part, modern platforms do not solve 

such disputes between parties. Moreover, platforms with such mechanics typically charge an 

additional fee for arbitration and often favor the paying side. Our service has several preventive 

measures that will allow parties to resolve disputes on their own in most cases, as well as an 

arbitration system that will resolve disputes between participants with the help of independent 

platform experts.

3. OWNERSHIP VALIDATION
One of the major problems contributing to most of the unforeseen costs is fraud, when a fraud-

ster impersonates an Influencer by hacking into his accounts. These situations harm both parties, 

Advertiser and Influencer. SocialMedia.Market applies special procedures providing a transparent 

and reliable marketplace. Influencers are verified and authorized to ensure they are really who 

they claim to be. Additionally, two factor authentication ensures protection and account owner-

ship within the platform. 

4. EASY COMMUNICATIONS AND INTERACTIONS
Engagement and arrangement is one of the most time-consuming tasks for 

both the Brand and the Influencer. At SocialMedia.Market we pay great 

attention to making collaboration more simple and effective. With our power-

ful CRM-system, in-platform chat app, Smart Contract templates, chat tips, 

instant notifications and mobile app, organizing contacts, messages, commu-

nicating and staying up-to-date will be convenient.

5. SIMPLE MANAGEMENT
 A step-by-step procedure of setting  up the ad campaign with a  smart-contract will simplify all 

the stages of cooperation.



25

6. HIGH-QUALITY USER EXPERIENCE
 With the trend of using mobile devices to solve everyday tasks, we understand that our platform 

should be convenient and compatible with all kinds of devices. Therefore, we use progressive 

technologies to make SocialMedia.Market cross platform. Brands and Influencers will be able to 

utilise IOS and Android applications conveniently, staying in touch anytime, anywhere.

7. ADDITIONAL WAYS TO BE REMUNERATED
Using our Dispute Solution system platform members will be rewarded with SMTs for their active 

personal engagement in dispute arbitrations. This will be available only for users who hold a 

certain number of tokens in their accounts.

3.4 FEATURES FOR ADVERTISERS

There are many features that will make the management of Influencer Campaigns more conven-

ient for brands and digital media marketing experts:

1. UNLIMITED ACCESS TO INFLUENCERS ALL OVER THE WORLD
Influencers of lower rank, also known as Tier 2 Influencers or micro-Influencers, can provide an 

outstanding campaign results, and they are easier to engage with. These Influencers are especial-

ly fruitful when reaching a sub-community, and their campaigns can be scaled for larger reach 

while keeping a personal approach. Social Media Token will allow users to interact with Influenc-

ers globally with no limitations caused by complicated payments policies.

2. OPERATING COSTS OPTIMIZATION
Managing of Influencer Marketing programs is a very time-consuming 

process and Influencer Marketing platforms, or agencies require an adver-

tiser to pay up to 50% commission for such services. With the help of our 

services, brands can expect to reduce the costs associated with launching 

Influence Marketing campaigns significantly.



26

3. LESS TRANSACTION FEES
Traditional payment methods may  require high processing fees 

and complicated banking and compliance procedures. Our platform 

is open for advertisers all over the world making all payments low-

cost and easy to proceed.

4. SMART MATCHING
One of the challenging tasks in creating a campaign is choosing the right Influencer to engage the 

right audience. Our service provides the most complete database, advanced search engine and 

Data Science Technologies for a quick search and selection of relevant channels for brand place-

ment. Advanced filters provide a convenient means to sift through millions of profiles, focusing 

only on the appropriate ones. An advertiser can either filter the database by preferred influencers 

parameters or target audience characteristics. 

OUR PLATFORM IS DESIGNED TO DELIVER INFLUENCERS 
TO BUSINESSES OF ANY SIZE AND ANY BUDGET

5. PRECISE TARGETING
Influencers have a combination of popularity and expertise (perceived or real). They may have 

reach, credibility or both. SocialMedia.Market implements several rank systems that will help to 

determine an Influencer’s efficiency and relevance for a brand, as well as their credibility as a 

partner.

6. AVAILABILITY FOR SMALL AND MEDIUM BUSINESSES
Small businesses, which value every spent dollar, encounter even more challenges when working 

with Influencers. Our platform is designed to deliver Influencers to businesses of any size and any 

budget. For instance, our service provides the most convenient tools and tips for marketers; 

whether the brand can work with influencer for products samples only, or with a dedicated 

sponsorship budget.



27

7. NO NEED TO BE A PRO
For newbies in Influencer Marketing, it is rather difficult to understand which formats of advertis-

ing are available with Influencers and how to use them correctly. With lots of tips and templates, 

we’ll make the creation process, engagement strategy and Influencer campaigns simple and clear.

8. EVERYTHING IN ONE PLACE
Another problem that makes the creation of Influencer campaigns so time-consuming, is the 

need to switch the manager’s attention between different social networks to manage campaigns 

and various means of maintaining communications with the Influencers. Our platform allows you 

to interact with different social networks, and communicate all in one place, whether you reach 

out through our platform, social profile or email.

9. POWERFUL MANAGEMENT
Using SocialMedia.Market, clients can always see the full history of cam-

paigns they’re interested in, including its source, updates, sales and specific 

details. This gives brands a better opportunity to make informed decisions 

about creating new campaigns and scaling influencer programs. The So-

cialMedia.Market CRM-system, designed specially to manage Influencer 

Marketing campaigns, provides user-friendly tools to: build campaigns, set 

guidelines, create reminders, track product shipment, review content, track 

posts etc.

10. GUIDED ANALYTICS
Every advertiser needs a “Guided Analytics” approach that goes beyond a simple review of trends 

in sales figures to identify techniques to increase revenue. A marketer or consultant needs to 

know the right sequence of questions to ask to improve sales, and where to find the answers. 

With our expertise we provide our clients a detailed report with top line metrics as well as the 

impact of each Influencer and the user-generated content that Influencer produced for the brand.



28

11. REAL-TIME DATA ANALYSIS AND ROI
SocialMedia.Market provides real-time tracking for mentions, engagements, true reach and ROI. 

For the SocialMedia.Market platform, tracking updated data triggers provide an essential and 

fundamental part of the system’s functionality and competitive edge. Our campaign analytics 

system provides views, reach and engagement analysis of the influencer’s campaign and allows 

users to get real-time Cost Per Engagement (CPE) metrics to analyze and control real money 

return on Influencer investment.

12. EXCLUSIVE DATA FOR PRECISE TARGETING
Thanks to extensive reach and data science, our system will provide advertisers with more de-

tailed information about Influencers’ channels and users’ behaviours. Our Artificial Intelligence 

learns from the campaigns delivered results, constantly improving Influencer identification based 

on the best campaign results achieved.

13. SMO (SOCIAL MEDIA OPTIMIZATION) READY
SMO is already recognized as a crucial part of marketing alongside with SEO and SMM. Multiple 

websites already utilize SMO campaigns, boosting their ranking authority from search engines. 

SocialMedia.Market’s tools provided to brands are created with the latest SMO trends and allow 

members to create campaigns which comply with basic optimization requirements.

3.5 FEATURES FOR INFLUENCERS

SocialMedia.Market is an outstanding tool with multiple features for all kinds of social media 

Influencers:

1. HIGH-QUALITY BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES FOR CONTENT MONETISATION
For beginners and minor opinion leaders, searching for ways of monetisation is a difficult and 

time-consuming task. Our service will give Influencers of any size an opportunity to choose 

brands, creating the most interesting and beneficial partnership.



29

2. NO ENTRY BARRIER
Most Influencer platforms require specific numbers of 

followers to be listed. Unlike others, SocialMedia.

Market is accessible even for new Influencers in the 

early stage of social presence.

3. EASY ENGAGEMENTS WITH BRANDS
Separate engagements with multiple brands adds complexity to Influencers. With the help of our 

platform, Influencers will be able to communicate with brands directly and approve content they 

create without a hassle, even for the different social media channels they run.

4. INSTANT WORLDWIDE PAYMENTS
Most Influencer Marketing platforms and agencies bind Influencers to wait for payouts  up to 60 

days. With Social Media Token (SMT), payouts will be passed in a split second after the Smart 

Contract executed  (provided that an Influencer’s account is verified and doesn’t have a history of 

platform rules violation). Social Media Token will allow influencers to get paid anywhere in the 

world. SMT integration with blockchain technology assets payment platforms like TenX will supply 

our token with the ability for day-to-day real-world payments.

5. INSIGHTS AND TIPS FOR CHANNELS DEVELOPMENT
There is a lack of data driven tools giving Influencers insights into the audience’s interactions with 

their content. Most opinion leaders don’t have a lot of experience and/or don’t understand what 

kind of analytics they need to pay attention to for channel growth which, in turn, will increase the 

level of monetisation. SocialMedia.Market will give bloggers complete information about their 

channel and tips on how to increase the level of engagement received based on insights provided 

by the platform.

6. CLEAR TASK ASSIGNMENT
Small and novice bloggers are often faced with displeasure from advertisers about marketing 

content they are producing or changes in content requirements. For example, in cases where the 

advertiser didn’t issue a clear task - the result may become irrelevant. SocialMedia.Market will 

significantly reduce the number of cases like the one described above with the help of Smart 

Contracts and fair dispute solution.



30

3.6 FEATURES OF SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET FOR AGENTS

In addition to the above listed benefits, SocialMedia.Market will provide opportunities in extra 

earnings for marketing agencies. Any agent will be able to become a partner of the platform and 

receive commission in Social Media Tokens for the provision of additional services for advertisers’ 

marketing campaigns or become a personal manager to Influencers. 

SocialMedia.Market will be a convenient tool for searching and managing business opportunities. 

With the help of service agents, one can easily manage the schedule of advertising content or 

check the effectiveness of advertising campaigns using the extended set of tools, anytime and 

anywhere.

3.7 HOW IT WORKS?

The SocialMedia.Market platform automates all business processes related to selection, creation 

and management of the Influencer’s marketing activities, including the distribution of financial 

means among the participants.

https://beta.socialmedia.market/


31

The platform has a friendly and easy-to-use interface for Brands and Influencers to help post and 

accept tasks easily. To ensure the authenticity of users, the platform will perform identity verifica-

tions whenever necessary. The unique identities of Advertisers and Influencers will be based on 

their addresses in the blockchain, making them difficult to forge. To protect personal data on the 

account of the Advertiser and Influencer, two-factor authentication can be applied.

In the following sections, we give a summary of several types of engagement scenarios with the 

platform. The described features are preliminary and can be modified during platform develop-

ment.

3.7.1 CAMPAIGN AND SMART CONTRACT CREATION FOR ADVERTISERS

The basic tools of SocialMedia.Market, like working with a social media database, will be accessi-

ble for Advertisers without verification. For creating tasks and campaigns, as well as communicat-

ing with Influencers, an Advertiser must pass the verification process, requiring them to provide 

details on the company profile.



32

SocialMedia.Market’s interface1 for brands enables creation and planning of campaigns from 

concept to completion. The first step in the creation of an Influencer Marketing campaign is to 

prepare a task for Influencers. Some of the factors the Advertiser must consider when creating a 

task: 

social media channel; 

start and end dates or period of campaign; 

region, country or city; 

campaign budget; 

the necessary files and the content they want to see; 

any additional information required for chosen channel and content type (for 

example, YouTube video tags for better SMO) 

target audience preferences for automatic Influencer selection, etc.

All this information will be easily set up with the help of templates and smart tips provided by 

SocialMedia.Market. 

1 Interfaces presented in Beta are not final and will change with the platform growth to answer users’ needs.



33

In the next step, the advertiser must select an Influencer for the campaign. This step can be 

completed in a couple of different ways. Making the campaign visible for all Influencers who 

match the target audience and task details is the easiest way to accomplish this step. In that case, 

campaigns will only be available for Influencers who have already verified their accounts on the 

platform. And, if an Influencer is interested, they would send a request to join the campaign. The 

second way to choose an Influencer would be to create a personal list containing preferred 

Influencers using the platform’s database, advanced search engine and filters. After creating this 

list, the Advertiser will be able to send the task to all Influencers on the list, even if they don’t have 

an account on SocialMedia.Market. 

The SocialMedia.Market goal is to provide brands, advertisers, and agencies with all the required 

details on the influencers, whether they have or don’t have an account on the platform. As the 

SocialMedia.Market platform gathers data on the influencers from every open source, the adver-

tisers don’t have any limitations while choosing an influencer. If the advertiser chooses an influ-

encer, who is not registered on the platform, the system sends the influencer a notification to 

every open channel available with an invitation to sign up in the system to be able to complete 

the task.

 

After the influencer is chosen, the advertiser has to set up the maximum budget, they are going 

to spend for the blogger-generated content. There will be notifications during the budget set up 

to help the advertiser adjust the budget to match with average counter bids and selected param-

eters. 



34

After receiving a notification about the new campaign, a blogger can accept, decline, or discuss 

the terms with the advertiser. When the campaign terms are agreed upon by both parties, the 

smart-contract is automatically created. The platform will utilize the smart contracts and the 

escrow transactions. 

After the content is created, the influencer shares a link or uploads the file with the advertising 

content for the preview. After all is set and the advertiser confirms the preview, the blogger 

publishes the content in their social media channels. In the most cases the platform will automati-

cally check the publication of content with AI systems (you can learn all the details in the AI and 

Data Science chapter). After the publication is checked, the platform automatically changes the 

campaign status. If the content was approved by the advertiser and suites to the selected social 

activity, the publication is automatically verified by the system. The published content should be 

accessed freely on the blogger’s channel during the time, described in the contract. This time 

should be no less than 30 days. If this rule is violated and content was deleted, influencer account 

will be downrated (check the details in Ratings) or suspended, pending or accessible balance on 

account might be locked or refunded. 

3.7.2 INFLUENCER PROFILE VERIFICATION AND INTERACTION
WITH BRANDS

In order to sign up to SocialMedia.Market, the opinion leader may log in via email or profile in G+. 

After the sign-up procedure it is necessary to verify and activate the channels of influence. Also, 

the opinion leader may set up 2-factor authentication. Each channel of influence is being verified 

separately, upon that the opinion leader receives the access to the advertising campaigns. The 

verification status of each channel specified in the personal account of the influencer.

Basically, the Influencer can receive a task in two ways:

1. Receive a “personal” task in the SocialMedia.Market CRM system or through another 

communication channel available in his public contacts, even if they weren’t previously 

registered on a platform.

2. Choose a task from the list of published “open” jobs by Advertisers. Moreover, the 

influencer can only see the tasks that comply with characteristics of their channel.



35

After receiving notification, the influencer should agree with the terms and conditions of a task by 

applying for it. If the job requires clarification or modification, parties should use the built-in 

messenger app. Once the advertiser confirms a job, a Smart Contract is automatically created. 

Within the period that is specified in the Smart Contract, the Influencer must complete the re-

quired task.

If the task isn’t complete within the arranged time, or prolonged at the Advertiser’s discretion, the 

Smart Contract is automatically cancelled. When the Smart Contract is executed, funds are 

automatically credited to the Influencer’s account.  For new and low-ranked influencers payment 

holds are applied.



36

The post with content should remain public on the Influencer’s social media account for at least 

30 days since the Smart Contract’s execution, unless otherwise stated in the Smart Contract. If 

this rule is violated and content was deleted, influencer account will be downrated (check the 

details in Ratings) or suspended, pending or accessible balance on account might be locked or 

refunded. 

3.7.3 DECENTRALIZED DISPUTE SOLUTION

The evaluation of the created content is largely subjective. Consequently, this subjectivity can 

cause disputes and dissatisfaction concerning the result. On SocialMedia.Market there are several 

preventive measures that allow parties to resolve disputes on their own, in most cases. In all 

other cases, parties can access a decentralized Dispute Solution system to resolve issues in 

cooperation between participants. Depending on the reasons of dispute, the process may be 

initiated by either Advertiser or Influencer. A list of contracts under dispute is available for 

platform experts to review, with controversial details being disclosed during the settlement 

process.

Every user within the SocialMedia.Market platform, or any other person willing to become a 

resolution expert, has the opportunity to participate in decentralized Dispute Solution system and 

earn Social Media Tokens by voting in particular cases. To become an expert and to have the 

ability to vote for resolutions, a user should be holding no less than 10000 SMTs on their account 

balance. Experts will be rewarded with SMTs for their engagement in the dispute solving proce-

dure. Dispute rewards will be deducted from the platform service fee reserved in every dedicated 

Smart Contract. 

In order to be rewarded for voting in Decentralized Dispute Solution system, user should meet 

next conditions: 

1) Hold certain amount of tokens on their SocialMedia.Market account

2) Complete a short education course to confirm the status of resolution expert

3) Choose controversy cases awaiting resolution

4) Check contract agreements and marketing campaign conditions

5) Review influencers’ content for compliance

6) Vote for resolution on the basis of fair assessment of a dispute



37

After case closure, every expert voted for resolution will be rewarded by Social Media Tokens 

proportionally to the contract value, taken from reserved platform service fee (further details will 

be determined in Q3 2018 after Dispute Solution System testing).

DISPUTE PREVENTION FEATURES:

Partial payment of contracts. While creating a Smart Contract, Advertisers can evaluate every 

part of the contract separately, based on total budget. Splitting the cost of the contract 

between contract items will enable reasonable adjustments of the contract amount in the 

case of partial fulfillment of terms by mutual agreement of the parties, without involvement 

of arbitration. This feature is especially important in cases when the advertising period or 

budget is limited, because it gives parties the opportunity to execute a contract with partial 

payment if conditions were only partially fulfilled.

Rating system affects placement price index. SocialMedia.Market will implement public 

arbitration rules for parties involved in arbitration which may result in a rating adjustment. If 

a user’s rating is downgraded (for example if a party often uses arbitration and loses), the 

platform will apply measures on the participant in the form of additional coefficients at the 

execution of Smart Contracts and restrictions in choice of participants (Advertisers and 

Influencers). This process will allow participants to evaluate the reliability of potential part-

ners and will increase the benefits of dispute resolution without the help of arbitration. 

    3.7.4 RATING SYSTEM

The reputation system is essential for establishing trust between all the parties. The 

SocialMedia.Market platform is creating several rating systems for every user on the platform.

Influencers are usually the popular experts in a particular field. They provide credibility, reach or 

both. SocialMedia.Market implements several ranking systems that will help to determine an 

influencer’s efficiency and their relevance for a brand, as well as their credibility as a partner. To 

begin with, the platform is implementing Engagement Rate, as it is fundamental for choosing the 

blogger. With the platform growth we are planning to implement the following:



38

1) Engagement Rate, which is based on the cumulative rating of the blogger’s  content

and the audience engagement 

2) Influencer trust rating. The trust rating consists of the following: the quantity of

successful campaigns completed by the user, whether the user complied to the condi-

tions of the content publishing, the average rating from the advertiser, the quantity of 

disputes and the average dispute resolution. Rating affect on price index will be 

determined with the platform development.

3.7.5 DATA SCIENCE

Our platform will use the latest technology for data collection and analysis. This will be achieved 

with help of gathering data from Social Graph and Open Data as well as the data inside the 

platform. With the use of Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning, SocialMedia.Market will 

provide an outstanding service to our users. 

Through collecting and analysing data within the platform we can gain valuable insights on

users behaviour, Influencers ROI etc. to provide this information to brands and Influencers to 

help them increase ROI and engagement.

BIG DATA ANALYTICS and predictive models for real-time reports. There are two types of data, 

required for the analytics on the platform:

1. Real-time content performance tracking and engagement metrics monitoring,

including comments, likes, shares.

2. User analytics complete with the segmentation by gender, age, interests, location,

and income.

As the APIs of social networks that provide user demographics and interests metrics are closed 

for the third parties, the only way to operate this data is based on predictions on social media 

usage patterns.

SocialMedia.Market creates a solution that aggregates all publicly available data from various 



39

social networks and utilizes this data by creating business intelligence reports, as well as an input 

of predictive model that allows identifying age, gender, interests, and location on the users on the 

channel.closed for third parties. The only way to get the data is to make predictions based on 

social media usage patterns.  

SocialMedia.Market is going to build a solution that downloads all publicly available data from 

social networks and use this data directly for building BI reports and as an input for predictive 

models that predict gender, age, location and interests of social media users.  

Artificial intelligence and machine learning for smart decisions and processes automation. 

Main purposes of AI system in the platform:

1. Help in finding the perfect match between Brands and Influencers for the maximum

engagement rates

2. Automate the process of contract compliance confirmation without communication

between parties

3. Helps to make the right decision about future campaigns and evolution of exposure

pathway

NATURAL LANGUAGE PROCESSING (NLP)

NLP refers to a field of AI focusing on understanding 

language, which includes reading

comprehension, language translation, text summariza-

tion, question answering, sentiment

analysis, and text generation. This enables an opportu-

nity to learn about users behaviour and learn how the 

community reacts to each campaign.

IMAGE RECOGNITION

Images are processed by a Deep Learning algorithm 

that can extract information, recognize the content of 

an image and identify Brands and products.



40

Amazon AWS services is our preliminary choice for Machine Learning 

and AI algorithms that will be implemented in SocialMedia.Market. As 

AWS offers a broad array of compute options for training and inference 

with powerful GPU-based instances.

3.8 COMPETITIVE ADVANTAGES

SocialMedia.Market has significant points and features in comparison with currently existing tools 

Brands and Influencers have to leverage in the engagement process. The following table provides 

SocialMedia.Market’s competitive advantage comparison. All data was gathered from public 

sources and during comparison average indicators were taken into consideration.



41



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

PLATFORM 
AND TOKEN 
ECONOMY4

https://beta.socialmedia.market/


43

4.1. BUSINESS MODEL

SocialMedia.Market business model is advertising marketplace for bloggers and advertisers with 

integrated analytical tools and services based on AI and Big Data analysis. SocialMedia.Market 

provides one-stop solution for finding, creating, managing and analyzing native advertising 

campaigns in the content (video, audio, photo and textual) of social media influencers and their 

impact on targeted audience.

The platform profit generated from service fees included in contracts and transactions. As 

opened global marketplace, SocialMedia.Market will attract advertisers giving them opportunity 

to run multiply advertising campaigns with large number of bloggers seeking for monetizing their 

content channels. SocialMedia.Market will also bring to agencies and marketers possibility to 

collaborate with big groups of brands and influencers, providing them marketing services within 

the platform. SocialMedia.Market will offer different ways of partnership and types of native 

advertisement formats, engaging social media network audience not only in brand awareness, 

but in direct sales as the main goal.

Simple use case of marketing campaign created on SocialMedia.Market can be an integrated 

promo content to YouTube video with tagged link to webservice or store of advertiser. Using 

access to site analytics linked to advertisers’ profile it would be easy to follow audience interest in 

product and reward influencer for every sale generated from this channel. For example, native 

integration in video content will cost to advertiser 1000 SMT, giving to influencer additional 50 

SMT for each sale made by his followers during 30 days period. SocialMedia.Market will redeem 

10% fee from total contract value, unless influencer holds 5000 SMT deposit on his account. In 

this case 5% fee will apply to the executed contract.



44

4.2. SOCIAL MEDIA TOKEN

SocialMedia.Market’s platform will create a global marketplace for Advertisers and Influencer 

Marketing publishers among every major social network, providing convenient and transparent 

tools for interaction of any party involved. For maintaining commercial relationships between 

participants, SocialMedia.Market will collect a service fee from every executed contract. The 

amount of the fee may differ depending on the type of contract and complexity of interaction 

between parties, but will not exceed 10% of the contract value. The obtained service fee, reduced 

by operational costs and decentralized Dispute Solution rewards, forms the platform’s net profit. 

All operations within the SocialMedia.Market ecosystem are executed with its effective cryptocur-

rency token - Social Media Token (SMT), which ensures high standards of services and prevents 

any unauthorized human intervention in the processes within the system. The Social Media Token 

will create a self-driven economy, based on constant cooperation between influencers, advertis-

ers, marketing agencies and agents. The token will be valuable for platform users, not only by 

transactional means within the platform’s services, but also supported with exclusive features for 

token holders.

A user can utilize the following methods to operate the tokens:

An integrated wallet on the platform’s account;

Import their Ethereum wallet containing SMT tokens with private key;

Link an ERC20-compatible MetaMask wallet to the account.

Token holders will also have exclusive access to premium platform services. Holding a certain 

amount of tokens on their accounts will grant them access to deep analytical data, exclusive 

insights to audience outreach of bloggers they are willing to cooperate with, special advertising 

formats, content development tools for bloggers, channel audience growth strategies and cam-

paigns, exclusive advertising contracts with well-known brands and marketing consultations.

Participation in the decentralized dispute solution system will not only support proper advertising 

campaigns execution and grant equal rights to every user, it will guide platform development. 

Voting for such resolutions will bring rewards to token holders for active personal participating. 

To participate in voting, user must maintain a certain amount of tokens on his balance on a 

constant basis.



45

Moreover, token holders may perform dedicated marketing services for platform users and 

include their service fee to every executed smart contract from campaign they have helped to 

create.



46

Сonstantly maintaining a decent amount of tokens on balance will decrease the platform’s fee for 

executing campaigns.

Integration within blockchain assets payment platforms like TenX, potentially can make SMT a 

popular, day-to-day payment method within the social media e-commerce network and the 

industry, as a whole. It can also become a convenient global donation method for bloggers and 

streamers in the early stages of their channel’s content development.

Every platform user, or any person willing to become an industry expert, can be a part of So-

cialMedia.Market’s decentralized Dispute Solution system. Experts who have actively participated 



47

in the solution will be rewarded by SMT deducted from the platform service fee reserved in every 

Smart Contract.

In the platform’s basic model, the Ethereum blockchain technology is considered as the most 

relevant for SocialMedia.Market’s needs. Therefore, Social Media Tokens are going to be operated 

as ERC20 compatible tokens. However, with consistent development of SocialMedia.Market’s 

platform and introduction of functionality driven by new technology solutions, there are prospec-

tive plans of migrating to another convenient blockchain platform such as EOS, Tezos, Raiden, 

Waves or self-developed blockchain protocol. In this case, all Social Media Tokens will be ex-

changed 1-to-1 with the new platform supported token. Tokens will be exchanged automatically 

after hitting users wallet on the platform (or linked one). 6 months transition period will be 

applied.

4.3. ADOPTION 

The key goal here is to introduce a decentralized influencer marketing marketplace to the audi-

ence that has little-to-no experience with the cryptocurrencies market and limited knowledge of 

the blockchain technology. The SocialMedia.Market ecosystem is to be expended way beyond the 

original crypto community, reaching broader audiences and focusing on advertisers and publish-

ers daily operations. The SocialMedia.Market team has extensive experience in the influencer 

marketing industry, creating exactly what this audience wants. We are creating an marketplace, 

where the operation of the SMT token will be easy and intuitive, simplifying all the operations 

within the ecosystem and ensuring superior security at the same time. We are also making sure, 

that it will be extremely easy to create and maintain a cryptocurrency wallet with SMT tokens.



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

TECHNOLOGY 
OVERVIEW5

https://beta.socialmedia.market/


49

5.1 CONCEPT OF BUILDING AN APPLICATION

Micro service architecture, relevant technologies according to specific needs, use of contem-

porary frameworks and patterns only 

Secure transactions with the help of blockchain and Smart contracts

Service dockerizing, unique isolated environment for each service, reliable identical environ-

ment for each version of the product

Orchestration of containers (kubernetes), seamless and separate service deployment

Two-protocol communication between services - TCP/HTTP, isolated data transferring inside 

overlay net, JWT authorization between services during communication

Application is deployed in the Cloud, automatic scaling of resources depending on the load, 

DDoS attack protection

Application development using Agile (Scrum) methodology, Continuous integration, Continu-

ous Deployment, code writing standards, multilayer testing of releases (including bug testing) 

during the development, distribution and deployment of services.

5.2 ARCHITECTURE

The application is thought to be built, based on micro-service architecture. Briefly, micro-service 

architectural style is an approach in which a single application is built as a set of small services, 

each of which works on a personal process and communicates with others using lightweight 

mechanisms – HTTP generally. These services are built around a business’ needs and deployed 

independently, using a totally automated environment. There is an absolute minimum of central-

ized operation of these services. The services on their own can be written in different languages 

and can use different technologies of storing data.



50

Arbitrage User cabinet Two factor
authentication

Rating
system

Event
collectors

service

Chat
messages Tips Analitycs service

Lead
Generator

User
balances

Balance
operations

Tasks
service

RabbitMQ
queue

Smart
contracts

Source
parsers

Task state
checker Source API

Schedule
service

Report
service

Any new
future...

Commmunication layer
(Overlay network)

API gateway service

RESTful

Any other APPWEB APP Mobile APP

SOCIAL MEDIA MARKET ARCHITECTURE

Redls pub/sub
message broker

JWT service



51

5.3 DOCKERIZING

Dockerizing and isolating of components are not new concepts in the world of calculation. Some 

operation systems like Unix have been using “mature” container technologies for more than 10 

years. 

Docker, which appeared a bit later, has positioned itself as an instrument for simplification of the 

work aimed at creating and controlling containers. Docker did not introduce a lot of new ideas, 

but made containers available for an average developer and system administrator by the simplifi-

cation of processes and interface standardization.

Some of most attracting advantages of dockerizing are:

Abstraction of host system from containerised applications

Scaling simplicity

Simplicity of control over dependencies and versions of applications

Very easy, isolated runtime environment

Redis pub/sub
message broker

Queries from other
services through Redis

Never-ending
loop

Service application

Database (for example PostgreSQL)

Any required
application

microservice structure



52

Shared layers

Ability to arrange and predictability

One of the first questions during the process of an application’s development, which will be 

deployed in containers, is application architecture. Usually, containerised applications work better 

with a service-oriented architecture.

Service-oriented applications divide the system’s functionality into separate components, which 

cooperate between each other through clearly defined interfaces. The container technology itself 

encourages such type of elaboration, because it allows scaling independently or updating each 

component.

5.4 ORCHESTRATION OF CONTAINERS

Orchestration — is a coordination of cooperation of several containers. Basically, you can create a 

container with all the necessary processes which have already started, but this approach lacks 

scaling flexibility, architecture change and creates security issues, as, in this case, the processes 

are not isolated and can influence each other without limits.

 Orchestration allows the building of information systems from small bricks-containers. Each 

container oversees one task only, and communicates through networking ports and common 

directories. If necessary, the containers in this “orchestra” can be changed: for example, if you 

need to check the work of the application on a different database version.

Kubernetes is an open code project meant to control the cluster of Linux containers as a single 

entity. It allows for control, begins container dockerizing with a great number of hosts and keeps 

the collocation of large amounts of containers, work with services and replications controlled. The 

project was started by Google Company and is now supported by many other companies such as 

Microsoft, RedHat, IBM and Docker.

The project pursues two objectives. If you use Docker containers, you face the questions of how 

to scale and bootstrap containers at a large amount of Docker hosts simultaneously, and how to 



53

balance them. The project offers high-level APU, which defines high-level logical grouping of 

containers. Using Kubernetes, it is possible to define container pools, balance loads and set 

mutual placement.

When using orchestrators as the main mechanism of container control, the possibility for “seam-

less” application update emerges, i.e. without real shut-down. The process of the start of each 

application version is as follows: the orchestrator creates a copy of the application (service) with 

new versions of the containers. After that, it checks the work status of each container and sends 

back status reports. If all statuses are positive, the orchestrator changes the old stack into a new 

one. Old stacks are then deleted.

5.5 COMMUNICATION BETWEEN SERVICES

The concept of micro-service architecture assumes that services actively communicate with each 

other, like how users communicate. While executing the request, the user refers to public service 

methods directly (made with the help of front application, mobile application etc.) using standard 

HTTP protocol, receiving answers simultaneously. If the service needs to receive an answer from 

another service(s) to form a response to a user’s request, it is done by sending a message by 

means of TCP protocol in asynchronous mode. This approach leads to minimization of query(s) 

overhead and elimination of dependence from the working capacity of interrogated  service. It 

allows the response to a user request be as fast as possible, even if services can be in different 

data centers or are unavailable.

All services are based in overlay network. This sufficiently increases general application security. 

Overlay-networks are used in terms of clusters, where virtual networks, used by containers, unite 

several physical hosts, where Docker is started. When you start the container as a cluster (as a 

part of the service), multiple networks join by default, and each of them corresponds to different 

connection specifications.

Communication security is provided by JWT-authorization. JSON Web Token (JWT) — is a marker, 

which contains all baseline information for authentication and authorization in an encrypted way. 

However, you do not need to keep user data in sessions, as the marker is self-contained.



54

5.6 CLOUD AS A METHOD OF APPLICATION STORAGE

Cloud storage is a good way of storing data and providing access to it (including access through 

the Internet) with the possibility of scaling the resources. This is the storage, which keeps data at 

multiple distributed servers, which are provided for the use of clients. Cloud service providers like 

Amazon Web Services or Google Cloud, own the equipment, which is connected to the net and 

software, and operate it, while users allocate and use the necessary resources by means of 

internet application. Cloud storage releases expenses connected to purchase and technical 

service of personal storage infrastructures. It increases flexibility, provides global scalability and 

allows the possibility to access the data at any time and from any place.

One of the important features of cloud storing is Auto-Scaling. Auto-Scaling allows support of the 

application availability at a permanently high level, and it dynamically scales the resources up-

wards and downwards in an automatic mode, depending on specified criteria. Auto-Scaling can 

be used for controlling groups of instances, to keep the group operational and available, and 

guarantees that a required number of instances is used at any time. You can also use Auto-Scal-

ing for the dynamic scaling of instances, to increase its amount during maximum load for keeping 

the performance ratio and lowering the volume of used resources within off-peak periods to 

reduce cost. Auto-Scaling suits applications with sustainable load pattern well and applications 

where the usage level changes hourly, daily, or weekly. 

The high-level of availability of the application is provided by security services from divided DDoS 

attacks, such as Cloudflare, Incapsula etc. 

Many cloud services offer “box” DDoS security services or on an additional basis. Generally, the 

service is chosen based on specific technical needs for a specific application. For our application 

we have chosen Cloudflare.

CloudFlare – is a service, which allows you to create your website faster by means of caching and 

makes it safer by means of filtering requests, which are like attacks. At the same time, you do not 

need to introduce any specific changes to the project. It can be achieved by adding a web site 

address to the service and changing NS entry for your domain.



55

5.7 APPLICATION DEVELOPMENT AND SUPPORT

Application development is done using Agile. In search of the best Agile practices, we have Scrum 

framework. 

Scrum – is a framework, which is meant for development and support of complicated products. 

The framework is based on the empiric method and is meant for development of high-value 

products in muddy environments.

Apart from controlling the software development projects, Scrum can be used in the software 

support team’s work, or as an approach to controlling the program’s development and adminis-

tration: Scrum of Scrums.

This is a process framework, which gained extensive use in the beginning of early 90s in terms of 

compound product development. Scrum is not the process or method for product development. 

Rather, it refers to the possibility to use multiple processes and techniques within the unique 

framework. Scrum lets us understand the effectiveness of operating processes and technical 

practices for product development, and work on their constant improvement as well.

5.8 BASIC TECHNOLOGY STACK

PHP 7 (Symfony 3), NodeJS, RESTful, 

Doctrine 2, MySQL (Galera cluster), MongoDB

RabbitMQ, Redis, ZeroMQ

Angular 4, Bootstrap 4, SCSS, Jade, Webpack

Docker (compose, swarm, hub)

Git, Bitbucket, Gitflow

Rancher, Nginx, Traefik, CircleCI, Satis, Cloudflare

Amazon AWS, Google Cloud, Linode, Digital ocean

Jira, Confluence, Gmail, FreeIPA

Centos 7, Ubuntu



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

DEVELOPMENT 
AND ECOSYSTEM 
EXPANSION PLAN6

https://beta.socialmedia.market/


57

6.1 ROADMAP 

The SocialMedia.Market roadmap focuses on the development of the technology, operations 

infrastructure, new partnerships, and marketing initiatives. The roadmap is presented below. 

Dates and activities may be subject to change.



58



59

6.2 MARKETING STRATEGY

ECOSYSTEM EXPANSION

As the technology required for operating the SocialMedia.Market ecosystem at scale will be 

available in Q3 2018, our focus will shift to project growth. As soon as the platform’s interface is 

available, we are launching the investments in the network growth, scaling up with the further 

development of the ecosystem. 

The marketing budget in the amount of 38% of the raised during the token sale is going to be 

distributed to the general international advertising campaign of the platform. Besides, the part of 

the budget will be forwarded to the development of regional offices and marketing campaigns. 

The regional advertising campaigns will be carried out by the representative offices of the regions 

(more about the development in the regions and allocated budget may be read in the chapter 

“Geographical Expansion plan”) under the control of the head office of SocialMedia.Market in 

accordance with the guidelines of the company. The main purpose of the mission is the establish-

ment, development and support of platform community in the region.

The expansion of SocialMedia.Market heavily depends on influencer and advertiser engagement 

within the platform. 

ADVERTISERS (BRANDS AND AGENCIES)

For rapid SocialMedia.Market platform evolvement it is important to attract huge brands and 

advertising agencies. This will allow to bring more influencers to the platform, as they are inter-

ested in cooperating with premium advertisers.  

Nevertheless, it is important for further development of the SocialMedia.Market platform to shift 

the main focus to the startups and small businesses. They are the basis for the future market 

growth and the platform evolvement.

To reach the first ad campaign turnover goal ($10M) by the end of Q3 2018, SocialMedia.Market 

plans to attract more than 1000 advertisers, who will start 2 ad campaigns each with average 

budget of $7000. According to the recent estimates, the average campaign budget reaches 

$750001. We have reduced this sum, as SocialMedia.Market is primarily focused of startups and 

1 Estimates are based on the Linqia “The State of Influencer Marketing 2017 Final Report”



60

small businesses.

To attract brands and agencies SocialMedia.Market is going to hold the following activities:

 Direct communication with brands and advertising agencies.

Taking part in conferences and exhibitions. We are focused both on marketing and 

blockchain events, as well as the startup, technology and business development 

conferences.

Educational sessions, online-seminars, creating educational content about influencer 

marketing and the SocialMedia.Market platform, as well as the opportunities and 

benefits of the blockchain technology and cryptocurrencies. 

Partnership with leading portals, influencers, marketing and business growth  associa-

tions, business schools (the biggest influencer marketing portal – InfluencerMarketing-

Hub is already our partner). 

There are several programs to motivate brands to use the platform during the first year. They are 

focused on the ecosystem and user-retention.

SocialMedia.Market will run the Social Media Early Birds program, which provides the opportunity 

to run the first test ad campaign for free. This campaign will be with a fixed budget and a limited 

number of influencers. The test campaign budget will be calculated based on the token sale 

results. 

The next step is an accumulation system of advertiser rewards in the platform’s commission – 

SocialMedia Rewards. The advertiser will be able to return up to 5% of their budget for a 

successful ad campaign. The percent of the return depends on the quantity of the influencers, 

being engaged in the campaign, and is independent of the campaign budget. The returned funds 

could be used for the next ad campaign and cannot be withdrawn from the system (there may be 

changes within the motivation program, after it has been tested). The program is developed 

based on the company’s experience, which shows that for a successful influencer marketing 



61

campaign it is important to reach at least 15 influencers.

This reward system will allow to motivate advertisers to start new ad campaigns on the platform, 

as well as to promote the blockchain technology and educate on the cryptocurrencies and utility 

use of Social Media Token.

INFLUENCERS AND AGENTS

The more active influencers join the platform, the quicker the platform evolves. We are planning 

to execute several global ad campaigns to boost brand awareness and ensure the constant 

growth of the bloggers quantity on the platform. 

As it was described in the chapter 3.7.1, while setting up the campaign and setting targeting 

options the brand can choose an automatically generated pull of bloggers. When a brand opts for 

this, every blogger who meets the targeting requirements will get a notification with an invitation 

to join the brands campaign, as well as with the information about the motivation program. This 

will be additional way to attract the new bloggers to the platform.

The SocialMedia.Market Early Birds program (which is active during the first year of the platform 

operations) is focused on engaging the blogger into the platform operations. It provides an 

opportunity to take part in the first several campaigns without any platform fees (the quantity of 

campaigns will be defined based on the token sale results).

Moreover (as previously noted in the chapter 4.2), every holder of 5000 and more tokens has 

access to the loyalty program, that allows to reduce the service fee.

For extra influencer motivation to join the platform as well as educate influencer on how to 

interact with the platform, each blogger will be offered to participate in SocialMedia.Market trial 

campaign. The trial SocialMedia.Market campaign is similar to campaigns created by brands, and 

introduces the influencer with the functionality of the platform, operation and interaction with 

the brand. Within the trial campaign the influencer will be asked to do SocialMedia.Market pro-

motional post on the influencers linked social channel within any available types of content 

(review, product placement, etc.). Each participant of the campaign will receive a reward accord-



62

ing to the level of coverage of influencer (campaign budget will be determined upon the results of 

the token sale). 

The work with the community is important in order to attract and maintain interest to the plat-

form among influencers. Therefore a significant part of the marketing budget will be allocated on 

creation of educational content for influencers. We expect that this will provide rapid growth and 

support of the community. This educational content will be dedicated not only to tips on 

interaction with the platform, but also recommendations and tips for channel development, 

analytics, audience engagement and etc. Training for aspiring bloggers with help of professionals 

of the industry will create an additional channel of influence of the platform as well as lead to the 

greater coverage and better distribution of information about the platform.

6.3 GEOGRAPHICAL EXPANSION

The plan for presence development in regions is based on the popularity of social networks in a 

particular region and growth rate of new users1. The access to the regions complies with the 

development of platform and access to social networks relevant in the particular region. Our 

team’s developing experience of our own projects such as CSGO.CASH, provides us with the clear 

vision of what regions the influencer marketing is the most popular type of marketing. It has also 

been taken into account of this plan. 

To achieve the project milestones, it will be necessary to build highly-competent international 

team to develop and promote the platform in different countries. Currently, the head office of 

SocialMedia.Market is located in Ukraine, Kiev, and operates an additional office in Moscow. Now 

we are working on opening an office in San Francisco, USA. In accordance with the plan of spread-

ing up to the regions that can be seen below, we are to open offices in each of them. This activity 

will allow to carry out the search, support and interaction with local brands and influencers most 

effectively, considering all the features of every single region. The local offices will work with the 

local legal issues, services support in the region, training, implementing of local marketing activi-

ties along with establishing of relationships with major brands and bloggers in the region as a 

part of general strategy and guides of SocialMedia.Market.

1 For more detailed information check Apendix 1

https://csgo.cash


63

Expansion plan depending on the amount of funds raised during Token Sale.

SocialMedia.Market is launching activity to deliver the research of the China, Japan and Brazil 

markets by the time the service is developed and fully launched in US, UK and CIS markets. 

The company will expand to new markets and add new features, reaching set budget goals during 

the main token sale.

The sums presented as milestones are required for research and development of new functional-

ity, establishment of the company on the new markets, legal and financial regulations, hiring a 

team of professionals, as well as the first two years of operation on the new market. 

After these two years the branch either becomes profitable or becomes closed. 

Every new country should become profitable for operations within 6-12 months from the market 

entering.  



64

Every half of the year we are assessing the development of the company in the country, it’s 

potential and are deciding on the plan for the next 6 months.  

6.4 REVENUE FORECAST

Based on a pessimistic growth of influencer marketing market and average cost of campaigns 

launched with Influencers, we can make a rough estimation of a financial forecast. Average cost 

of campaigns will rise with more bloggers and agencies join the platform.

PESSIMISTIC GROWTH

Forecast of a breakdown of funds raised by years in case of reaching hard cap during the main 

token sale.

EXPENSES BREAKDOWN, USD



65

Cost allocation scenarios depending on the amount of funds raised during token sale:

COST ALLOCATION SCENARIOS, USD



JANUARY 2018
ver 2.0.0 Draft version. May be amended.

TOKEN 
DISTRIBUTION7

https://beta.socialmedia.market/


67

7.1. OVERVIEW

Social Media Tokens (SMTs) will be issued as ERC20 compatible tokens. Based on the number of 

tokens distributed during both sale phases, 10% more tokens will be issued for team and 5% 

platform core functionality (6 month of vesting period), and 5% for partners and advisors. This will 

form the total amount of SMTs ever issued. 

15% of tokens issued for team and platform core functionality will be locked for 6 month, 5% 

issued for platform core functionality will be unlocked immediately after vesting period ends, 10% 

of tokens issued for the team will be proportionally released during next 12 month. 4% of tokens 

will be issued for advisory board. No vesting period set for it.

Contributed funds will be allocated in ETH and USD in equal proportion, order to cover operation-

al expenses on time.

TOKEN SALE SOFT CAP: 1 600 ETH (5 000 000 SMT)
TOKEN SALE HARD CAP: 16 000 ETH (MAX. 58 000 000 SMT)

TOKEN PRICE AND BONUSES:

80% 15%
6 months 
of vesting  period

5%



68

7.2. TOKEN SALE: PHASE #1
Public sale of Token Sale: Phase #1  was held 7-21 of December 2017. 7 553 358.45 SMTs were 

sold during the Phase. Soft Cap successfully reached. 

PRE-SALE DATES: 20 November - 7 December 2017 12:00 GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

START DATE:  7 December 2017 12:00 GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

END DATE:     21 December 2017 12:00 GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

SOFT CAP:     Reached during Token Sale: Phase #1

Token exchange rate: 1 ETH = 3000 SMTs

Minimum contribution amount: 0,01 ETH / 30 SMTs 

Maximum contribution amount: unlimited 

Contribution methods: ETH, BTC 

Bonuses: Pre-Sale: 30%, Public sale: 10%

7.3. TOKEN SALE: PHASE #2
START DATE: 9 February 2018 12:00 PM GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

END DATE:    16 March 2018 12:00 PM GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

PRE-SALE:      2-9 February 2018  12:00 PM GMT (1:00 pm CET) 

 

Token exchange rate: 1 ETH = 2500 SMTs 

Minimum contribution amount: 0,1 ETH / 250 SMTs 

Maximum contribution amount: 300 ETH 

Contribution methods: ETH, BTC, LTC, XRP, BCH, DASH, DOGE, ETC, NEO, XMR, ZEC 

Bonuses:          Pre-Sale: 20% (min. contribution 25 ETH)                 

Public Sale: Days 1-5: 15%, Days 6-20: 10%, Days 21-35: 5%                 

Referral Program Bonus: Give 3%, Get  5%

Distribution of tokens to the purchaser’s account located at ico.socialmedia.market (the “Web-

site”) will be made in accordance with terms and conditions, provided at the Website, by the later 

of: (a) within Two (2) weeks upon completion of Tokens sale, or within Two (2) weeks from the 

date when Hard Cap is reached (although SocialMedia.Market may extend the delivery deadline 

for additional time if necessary to address any unforeseen technical difficulties and provided that 

SocialMedia.Market notify the purchaser of the same), or (b) within Two (2) weeks after the 

purchaser has provided complete and accurate information required by SocialMedia.Market 

(KYC), as defined in clause 7.4 below.

SocialMedia.Market
Smart Contract on GitHub

https://github.com/SocialMediaMarket


69

7.4. KNOW YOUR CUSTOMER (“KYC”) 

At any time within the timeframe of ICO process, or after the ICO is completed, SocialMedia.

Market will send to each purchaser, request to provide information verifying her/his identity. The 

purchaser will be required to provide the copy of her/his ID (passport, driving licence or national 

ID card), and residence confirmation. SocialMedia.Market reserves the right, at its sole discretion, 

to request the purchaser to provide additional information, including, but not limited to, address, 

source of funds, or any other information in purchaser’s account (form), such as date of birth, 

citizenship, country of residence. Completion of KYC is a substantial and fundamental condition 

of token distribution. All purchasers are required to complete KYC procedure to SocialMedia.

Market satisfaction. 

7.5. USE OF FUNDS

The funds raised through the token sale campaign will be allocated for all SocialMedia.Market 

platform features available for all ecosystem participants, as well as strong marketing support for 

fast growth in the number of the platform users, and simplification of the process of getting used 

to the new tools for advertisers and bloggers.

    37% RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT

Fees for this Fund will cover the costs of developing the platform, including all necessary interfac-

es and applications of the platform, the development of tools for creating smart contract, the 

development of blockchain solutions for the system of dispute settlement, etc. This budget 

includes the extension of current R&D center up to 25 employees, as well as additional consulta-

tions with the necessary experts.

    38% MARKETING & EDUCATION CAMPAIGNS

We have allocated the budget for attracting both advertisers and bloggers, as well as user reten-

tion. You can find all about the project’s marketing initiatives in the “Marketing strategy” chapter.

37% 38% 12% 8% 5%



70

     12% ADMINISTRATIVE & OPERATIONAL

This budget is allocated to cover the expenses of the back-office, as well as the salaries of all the 

employees, excluding the development center.

     8% INFLUENCERS & AGENCIES BONUSES

This budget is allocated separately from other marketing expenses for additional motivation 

programs for bloggers and advertisers on the platform – SocialMedia.Market Early Birds, So-

cialMedia Rewards.

     5% LEGAL

This budget is allocated to cover the legal expenses for the platform development and its roll out 

in ne regions.

7.6. BOUNTY AND REFERRAL PROGRAMS

Referral reward to a referral link owner is 5%, based on the number of tokens purchased using 

the referral link. Those who bought tokens using a reference link receive an extra 3% bonus. 

Total bounty allocated for bounty campaign will be either 0.7% of the total SMT tokens sold or 

560k SMT tokens, whichever is lower.

https://socialmedia.market/en


71

More details: https://bitcointalk.org/index.php?topic=2321059.0.



72

8.1. OUR TEAM

35 people now involved in the project and we are hiring more marketing specialists, blockchain 

engineers and growing our development team. We are expecting to increase SocialMedia.Market 

team to 50-70 people in the next 4 months. Now 40% of personnel running marketing strategies, 

35% R&D team and rest is operational, administrative and support.

8. TEAM

DMITRY 
SHYSHOV 

CEO, FOUNDER

MAKSYM
CHURKIN 

TECH LEAD

YEHOR
SHYSHOV 

BDM

ALEXANDRA 
MOROZOVA

CO-FOUNDER, CMO

VIKTOR
PEREKHOD 

BDM

OKSANA
PODKAMENNAYA 

FINANCIAL OFFICER

A passionate entrepreneur, the CEO and founder of
R.Games and Nontita Limited, operating in games.

Maksym is an experienced full product modular 
architecture specialist and Scrum master.

Aleksandra has more than 7 years of experience in 
digital marketing and worked on marketing campaigns 
for Apple, Sony, Dell, Asus, Lenovo, Microsoft Xbox. 

Viktor has more than 8 years of expertise in building 
strategic marketing campaigns for new products and 
identifying new business opportunities.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/dmitryshyshov/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/aleksandramorozova/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/maksym-churkin
https://www.linkedin.com/in/viktor-perekhod-100103b1/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/yehorshyshov/


73

MAKSIM 
SHEVCHENKO

CREATIVE DESIGNER

NIKITA
MEDVEDEV

HEAD OF SEO

DIMA
MEDVEDCHUK

SOFTWARE ENGINEER

ALEXEY
IGNATOV

MARKETING LEAD

VICTOR
ANDES 

MARKETING EXPERT

ALEXANDER 
GRECHANYK

CREATIVE DIRECTOR

TAKA
SUPHLER

SINIOR FRONTEND 

YEHOR
SKLYAROV

CONTENT WRITER

NIKOLAY 
KRAVCHENKO

FRONTEND ENGINEER

MAKSIM 
KOVALENKO 

BACK-END DEVELOPER

EVHENYJ 
YVASHKO

SOFTWARE ENGINEER

MAKSIM
KRUPEC 

HEAD OF PPC

YAN
BORMAN

QA ENGINEER

YURIY
KOVALENKO

QA ENGINEER

https://www.linkedin.com/in/yurii-kovalenko-4a581614b/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/dima-medvedchuk-10726b124/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/maksim-kovalenko-509350148/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/andesviktor/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/esklyarov/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/nikita-medvedev-sjfenix/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/evgeniy-ivashko-54680736/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/maksym-krupets-7a2b12102/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/yan-bondarenko-31096016/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/nick-kravchenko/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/alexey-ignatov-bb053271/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/alexander-grechanyk-6bab98121/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/suphler/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/max-shevchenko-5176a562/


74

OLEG
OLEJNIK 

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

DMITRIY
KUZMIN 

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

ALEX
GORBACH

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

ROMAN
BURIY

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

TATIANA
SAPA

SEO EXPERT

IVAN
BABJUK

MEDIA BUYER

ZLATA
TKACHENKO 

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

YEVHEN
PYLYPENKO 

MEDIA BUYER

ALEX
KOBIZHSKYJ  

CUSTOMER SERVICE 

BOGDAN
MOROZ

PYTHON DEVELOPER

NIK
NOVIK 

LEAD MEDIA BUYER

https://www.linkedin.com/in/alexandr-gorbach-97580014b/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/zlata-tkachenko-497412152/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/nik-novik-ab2139149/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/yevhen-pylypenko-33198b116/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/ivan-babiuk-06a429152/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/tatiana-sapa-848530146/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/oleg-oliynyk-77381114b/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/roman-buriy-6360a0157/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/dmitriy-kuzmin-94b593157/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/ba-mz/


75

8.2. OUR ADVISERS

Keith Teare
Executive Chair UK venture company 

ACCELERATED DIGITAL VENTURES

Tatsunari Ono
CEO, Value Brain Co., Ltd. (Japan)

CEO, Beducate.ltd (Hong Kong)

Andrew Playford
Senior Vice President of Operations,

SONIC FOUNDRY, INC 

Gabriel Zanko
Tax Manager & Advisor 

NOKIA CANADA & NOKIA CHILE

Keith Teare recently advised on the successful ICOs of 
ICOBox (4000 BTC) and Crypterium ($51mln+). 

Previously he was a founder of TechCrunch and the first 
consumer Internet Service Provider in Europe - EasyNet. 

EasyNet and RealNames both achieved Unicorn status 
during the late 1990s.

Businessman who is actively engaged in investment 
activities in real estate, equity, Airbnb operations as well as 

cryptocurrency. He held Tokyo meetups of well-known 
cryptocurrency firms such as NEO, LISK, Quantum and 

Ardor.

Prior to Sonic Foundry, Andrew ran operations for Think 
New Ideas, another NASDAQ listed company that 

acquired and combined digital marketing and web develop-
ment companies. Think New Ideas was ultimately acquired 

for more than $250mm. 

Fintech entrepreneur-Advisor. Founder of MobileyourLife 
and involved in the AI-Fintech space providing solutions in 

the B2B space. ICO advisory in Fundraising Capital, 
International Business Development, Crypterium, FluzFluz, 

Genesis Vision

http://linkedin.com/in/kteare
https://www.linkedin.com/in/andrewplayford/
https://www.facebook.com/tatsunari.ono.1?ref=br_rs
https://co.linkedin.com/in/gabrielzanko


76

Alex Yastremski

Legal Counsel, San Francisco, Ca
Blockchain regulatory / compliance expert 

Peter Zhalov
Former VP Marketing & Advertising

at Wargaming.net, eSports and
blockchain enthusiastv

Slavik Nenaydokh

COO, Centuria Natural Foods,
San Francisco, CA

General counsel at Bitfury Group Ltd 
Fintech counsel Bingham McCutchen LLP

Head of M&A Emerging Markets, Exigen Capital 
Principal, Delphi Software International

Dima Zaitsev, PhD
Head of International PR & Business Analytics 

Department Chief , ICOBOX

2017 Dima became interested in blockchain and 
cryptocurrencies and started conducting limited-scope 

market research. He has his own columns on several 
Media Outlets in the U.S. including FXStreet.com, 

CoinSpeaker.com, and others.

Chafik Abdellaoui

Entrepreneur, the founder ACBMC, Bizzant,
XEDYAS IT HYBRID SOLUTIONS

Contributor to Mobile Go ICO success. Chafic 
is an accomplished business development 

professional with an extensive experience in 
eCommerce, gaming and electronic payments.

https://www.linkedin.com/in/chafikabdellaouiacbmc/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/peter-zhalov-35149225/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/alex-yastremski-b1889514/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/slavik-nenaydokh-7785492/
https://www.linkedin.com/in/dima-zaitsev/


77

9. MEDIA

CoinSchedule

Coinhills

btc2themoon

and many other on SocialMedia.Market official website

https://influencermarketinghub.com/influencer-marketing-evolves-via-cryptocurrency/
http://www.nasdaq.com/article/how-blockchains-can-influence-the-influencers-cm880899
https://www.bitbetnews.com/ico/platforma-dlja-marketing-vlijanija-socialmedia-market/.html
https://news.bitcoin.com/pr-meet-the-new-generation-of-online-advertising-with-socialmedia-market/
http://www.newsbtc.com/2017/10/27/blockchain-permeates-social-media-influencers-advertising-market/
http://www.livebitcoinnews.com/meet-new-generation-online-advertising-socialmedia-market/
http://bitcoinist.com/how-blockchain-tech-will-disrupt-influencer-marketing/
https://themerkle.com/meet-the-new-generation-of-online-advertising-with-socialmedia-market/
https://www.coinschedule.com/icos/e1438/socialmedia.market-.html
https://socialmedia.market/


78

10.CONTACTS
For all the questions or inquiries write us on 

INFO@SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET

Official website: 

HTTPS://SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET/

Join the conversation on:

TELEGRAM EN BITCOIN TALK TWITTER

TELEGRAM RU FACEBOOK REDDIT

INSTAGRAM MEDIUM YOUTUBE

https://beta.socialmedia.market/
https://bitcointalk.org/index.php?topic=2291309.0
https://www.facebook.com/Socialmedia.market.io/
https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCPJ919jN8eCcVDkzbCR06nw
https://twitter.com/SocialMedia_io
https://t.me/joinchat/B3UENkIW3R9A6v_4KnpOZQ
https://medium.com/socialmedia-market
https://instagram.com/socialmedia.io
https://www.reddit.com/r/SocialMedia_Market
https://t.me/joinchat/B3UENkX8gcVbekGkz3IqNA


79

11. RISK FACTORS
The purchase of SMT tokens (hereinafter referred to as the “Token” or “Tokens”) may be associat-

ed with a high degree of risk. To protect the interests of Token’s potential purchasers, So-

cialMedia.Market team conducted an analysis of such potential risks and outlined the result of 

this analysis in this chapter of the White Paper. IMPORTANT: THE LIST OF RISK FACTORS DE-

SCRIBED BELOW IS NOT EXHAUSTIVE. IN ADDITION TO THE RISKS DISCLOSED IN THIS WHITEPA-

PER, THERE MAY BE EXISTING OTHER RISKS WHICH SOCIALMEDIA.MARKET TEAM AT PRESENT 

CANNOT REASONABLY FORECAST. These risks can materialize in other forms of risk than those 

specified here. Prior to acquiring Tokens, each potential Token purchaser is advised to carefully 

review all the information and assess the risks of such purchase, including but not limited to, the 

risks set forth in this Whitepaper and to decide upon purchase of Tokens based on such assess-

ment.

 12.1. TECHNICAL AND TECHNOLOGICAL RISKS

12.1.1. RISKS OF THE BLOCKCHAIN

Tokens are released on Ethereum blockchain. In this regard, any malfunction of the Ethereum 

protocol may lead to a restriction in the use of Tokens, and / or to the fact that Tokens or the 

platform will function in an unforeseen manner.

12.1.2. RISK OF HACKER ATTACKS ON THE PLATFORM, SMART CONTRACTS, OR TOKENS. 

Tokens can be expropriated and / or stolen, by hacking Tokens, or otherwise. Hackers or other 

groups or organizations may attempt to intervene in a smart contract or Tokens in various ways, 

including, but not limited to, virus attacks, DDOS attacks, concerted attacks, network attacks, and 

denial of service attacks, and others. In addition, since the Ethereum platform is based on open 

source software, there is a risk that Ethereum smart contracts may contain intentional or uninten-

tional errors or shortcomings that could adversely affect Tokens or lead to loss of Tokens, or loss 

of access or control Tokens. In the event of such an error or weakness of the software, there can 

be no remedy, and tokens owners are not guaranteed any compensation or compensation.



80

12.1.3. RISK OF HACKER ATTACK ON THE COMPUTER OF TOKENHOLDER, OR LOSS OF PASS-

WORDS / OF PRIVATE KEYS. 

Purchased Tokens can be stored by the tokenholder in her\his digital wallet or safe, for which a 

password, a digital key or a combination of digital keys is required. Accordingly, the loss of the 

necessary keys associated with such digital wallet or safe, can lead to loss of access to Tokens. In 

addition, any third party that gets access to such passwords and / or private keys (by way of 

getting (through hacking, or negligence of tokenholder) access to login credentials of tokenhold-

ers’ hosting-wallet, or otherwise), will be able to use Tokens of the tokenholder. SocialMedia. 

Market assumes no liability for such losses.

12.1.4. RISK OF USING NEW TECHNOLOGIES, AND CHANGES IN TECHNOLOGY IN THE 

FUTURE. Tokens and blockchain are fairly new and relatively untested technologies. Although at 

the moment they have largely proven their efficiency, reliability and security, there is no 

guarantee that in future these technologies do not fail in any way. Further, as technological 

progress devel-ops, flaws can be found in these technologies, which flaws will prevent their 

functioning in the way that they function at the moment. Finally, there is no guarantee that 

these technologies will be compatible with any new technologies invented in future. In the event 

of such incompatibility, use of Tokens and blockchain can be found unreasonable and stopped.

12.1.5. RISK OF INCOMPATIBILITY OF THE CRYPTOWALLET SERVICE. 

An electronic cryptowallet or wallet service provider that tokenholder has chosen \ will choose for 

obtaining and storing Tokens, must be technically compatible with Tokens. Failure to comply with 

this condition may lead to the fact that the tokenholder will not be able to get access to her\his 

Tokens. Tokenholders must independently determine the fact of the compatibility of the cryptow-

allet she\he registered, with the Tokens. SocialMedia.Market assumes no responsibility for any 

errors related to wrong determination of the above fact.

12.2.   REGULATORY RISKS

12.2.1. RISK OF REGULATORY UNCERTAINTY. 

Regulatory status of cryptographic tokens, digital assets and blockchain technology, is unclear or 

not defined in many jurisdictions. It cannot be excluded that such technologies, and, in particular, 

Tokens, will in future become subject to one or more (adopted or new) interpretations of laws (or 



81

other regulations), court judgments, or actions by various regulatory bodies around the world, 

including, but not limited to, the imposition of restrictions on the use or possession of digital 

tokens, such as Tokens. Such changes can adversely affect Tokens in various ways, including, for 

example, by determining that Tokens are regulated financial instruments that require registration 

or compliance with other legal requirements and procedures. SocialMedia.Market may stop 

distributing Tokens, developing a platform or terminating operations in a particular jurisdiction if 

the actions of regulatory authorities of the relevant jurisdiction make it illegal or not commercially 

viable to proceed.

12.2.2. RISK OF INABILITY TO OBTAIN, MAINTAIN OR RENEW LICENSES AND PERMITS. 

As of the date of Tokens sale, there are no statutory requirements requiring SocialMedia.Market 

to obtain any licenses and permits necessary for the sale of the Tokens, but the risk that such 

legislative requirements may be enacted in the future cannot be ruled out. In this event, possibili-

ty of sale and further use of Tokens will depend on the procedure of issuing such licenses and 

permits, and on compliance with their terms. We cannot exclude that requirements of the law will 

be technically or economically unachievable for SocialMedia.Market. SocialMedia.Market may 

stop distribution of Tokens, develop a platform or terminate operations in a particular jurisdiction 

in the event of economic, technological or other inability to obtain the required licenses or per-

mits under such jurisdiction.

12.2.3. THE RISK OF GOVERNMENTAL ACTION. 

The industry of blocking and reversing tokens is new, and simply by virtue of novelty can be 

subject to increased supervision and regulatory control, including investigations or enforcement 

actions. There can be no guarantee that the government will not study the activities of the parties. 

All this can be investigated, which in turn can have a significant negative impact on Tokens and / 

or platform development.

12.3. BUSINESS RISKS.

12.3.1. RISK OF FAILURE IN DEVELOPMENT. 

It cannot be excluded that for various reasons, including but not limited to, for reasons of insol-

vency of business or technological strategies or business arrangements, technological problems, 



82

emergence of new technologies, etc., that the model that SocialMedia.Market developed and 

described in this Whitepaper, will not achieve the desired functionality, be inoperative, or work in 

a way different from what developers designed it for. Also, we cannot exclude the risk that for 

these or different reasons, development and implementation of the model can take longer than 

SocialMedia.Market predicts at the moment, and when the model is ready, it will appear to be 

outdated and\or irrelevant.

12.3.2. RISK OF INSUFFICIENT IMPLEMENTATION. 

It cannot be excluded that, for various reasons, including, but not limited to, for reasons of 

insolvency of marketing strategies, external constraints, or competitors’ actions, the model 

developed by SocialMedia.Market and described in this Whitepaper model may appear to be 

unpopular and\or unclaimed, lacking use and application.

12.3.3. RISK OF DEPENDENCE ON THIRD PARTIES. 

Even after the launch, the model developed by SocialMedia.Market and described in this Whitepa-

per will rely, wholly or partially, on third parties, for adoption and implementation of certain 

functions, as well as for continuing its development, maintenance and support. Though 

above-mentioned third parties are carefully selected by SocialMedia.Market team, there is no 

insurance or guarantee that these third parties will do their job properly, or otherwise meet users’ 

needs, and this can have a significant adverse impact on the platform.

12.3.4. RISK OF LOSS OF CASH. 

The project described in this Whitepaper, the model developed by SocialMedia.Market, the 

platform being created, as well as any funds collected within the framework of the ICO described, 

are not insured. In case of failure of the project for any reason, loss of functionality of the Token 

or platform, there is no private or public insurance representative to whom tokenholders can 

apply for reimbursement.

12.3.5. RISK OF FORCE MAJEURE. 

In the future, there may be extraordinary circumstances that SocialMedia.Market cannot reasona-

bly anticipate or prevent and that may be subject to restrictions or impediments to the operation 

of SocialMedia.Market or Token platform.



83

12. SOURCES
Ad-Blocking. Insight Report. Q3 2016. Global Web Index.

Mobile Ad-Blocking. GWI Trends Q3 2016. Global Web Index.

Social Media Engagement. Insight report. Q2 2017. Global Web Index.

Digital vs Traditional Media Consumption, Insight Report. Q1 2017. Global Web Index.

Mashable.com 3 billion social media users in the world http://mashable.com/2017/08/07/3-bil-

lion-global-social-media-users/#d2TBoghVSaq1

Socialmediatoday.com. 5 Predictions for the Future of Influencer Marketing. http://www.so-

cialmediatoday.com/marketing/5-predictions-future-influencer-marketing

Statista.com. Number of Social Media Users from 2010-2021. https://www.statista.com/statis-

tics/278414/number-of-worldwide-social-network-users/

Traackr.com. What is Influencer Marketing and Why Does it Matter? http://www.traackr.com/

influencer-marketing

Forbes.com. Why Influencer Marketing Will Explode in 2017. https://www.forbes.com/sites/

ajagrawal/2016/12/27/why-influencer-marketing-will-explode-in-2017/#752645c20a90

Emarketer.com Worldwide Retail Ecommerce Sales will Reach $1.915 Trillion This Year. https://

www.emarketer.com/Article/Worldwide-Retail-Ecommerce-Sales-Will-Reach-1915-Trillion-This-

Year/1014369




